Maine, session 132, LD962.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §2401, sub-§12-A is enacted to read:
12-A. Pet. "Pet" has the same meaning as in Title 7, section 3907, subsection 22-B.
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §2411-A is enacted to read:
§2411-A. Aggravated OUI resulting in death of pet
1. Aggravated OUI resulting in death of pet. A person commits aggravated OUI
resulting in the death of a pet if the person commits an offense under section 2411,
subsection 1-A, paragraph A and, as a result of the offense, the person kills a pet.
2. Penalties. Notwithstanding section 2411, subsection 5, a person who violates
subsection 1 commits a Class C crime for which the following penalties apply:
A. A fine of not less than $2,100 and not more than $7,000;
B. A period of incarceration of not less than 6 months and not more than 2 years;
C. A court-ordered suspension of a driver's license for a period of 3 years; and
D. Mandatory community service related to animal welfare as determined by the court.
3. Restitution. In addition to any other penalty, the court shall order the defendant to
provide restitution to the owner of the pet killed as a result of an offense under this section
for:
A. Veterinary costs incurred as a result of the incident;
B. The market value of the pet; and
C. Emotional distress suffered by the owner of the pet in an amount not to exceed
$3,000.